Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [161.1775] TRUNK HIGHWAY SYSTEM EXPANSION AND MAINTENANCE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Applicable entity" has the meaning given in section 161.178, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) "Capacity expansion project" has the meaning given in section 161.178, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (d) "Major highway project" has the meaning given in section 174.56, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin The requirements in this section are effective for a project that first enters the appropriate state or metropolitan transportation improvement program for fiscal year 2031 or a subsequent year. This section does not apply to a project that was either included in the state transportation improvement program or has been submitted for approval of the geometric layout before July 1, 2030. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Limitations on expansion. new text end new text begin An applicable entity is prohibited from including a capacity expansion project in the state transportation improvement program, or in a metropolitan transportation improvement program, if the most recent analysis in conformance with the transportation asset management plan under section 174.03, subdivision 1f, identifies a performance gap in the pavements or bridges asset categories. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Major highway project maintenance plan. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish a maintenance plan for each trunk highway segment included in a major highway project. The maintenance plan must: new text end new text begin (1) cover the greater of 60 years or the entire service life of the relevant infrastructure; and new text end new text begin (2) analyze the fiscal impacts to maintain the relevant infrastructure, including: new text end new text begin (i) preventive maintenance, preservation, and rehabilitation to maintain asset condition while minimizing life cycle costs; new text end new text begin (ii) operational costs; and new text end new text begin (iii) indirect costs. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1e. new text end new text begin Capital highway investment plan. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must annually prepare a ten-year capital highway investment plan that identifies trunk highway projects specified in the state transportation improvement program and relevant planned projects for the trunk highway system. new text end new text begin (b) At a minimum, the ten-year capital highway investment plan in each district of the department must: new text end new text begin (1) be based on expected funding during the plan period and, to the extent feasible, maximize long-term benefits; new text end new text begin (2) estimate the funding necessary to make optimal life cycle investments based on a period of not less than 60 years; new text end new text begin (3) identify investments within each of the asset categories specified in the transportation asset management plan under subdivision 1f, paragraph (b), clause (2), that are funded through the trunk highway capital program; and new text end new text begin (4) identify specific trunk highway segments that would need to be removed from the trunk highway system to provide for the resources necessary to deliver annual progress toward achieving the state transportation goals established in section 174.01. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1f. new text end new text begin Transportation asset management plan. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must maintain a risk-based transportation asset management plan that provides guidance for the preservation, improvement, and effective management of transportation system investments and assets under the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation. new text end new text begin (b) At a minimum, the transportation asset management plan must: new text end new text begin (1) meet the requirements under Code of Federal Regulations, title 23, part 515, or successor requirements; new text end new text begin (2) provide an inventory across asset categories, including but not limited to pavements, bridges, culverts, department buildings, intelligent transportation system facilities, traffic signals and lighting, pedestrian infrastructure, and transit infrastructure; new text end new text begin (3) identify local governmental units responsible for pavement and bridge assets on the national highway system; new text end new text begin (4) incorporate the performance measures and targets established in the statewide multimodal transportation plan; and new text end new text begin (5) for each performance measure, calculate and provide an explanation of performance gaps between targets and projected performance status for the next ten years. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.03, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Trunk highway performance, resiliency, and sustainabilitynew text begin ; reportnew text end . (a) The commissioner must implement performance measures andnew text begin annualnew text end targets for the trunk highway system in order to construct resilient infrastructure, enhance the project selection for all transportation modes, improve economic security, and achieve the state transportation goals established in section 174.01. (b) At a minimum, the transportation planning process must include: (1) deleted text begin an inventory ofdeleted text end transportation deleted text begin assets, including but not limited to bridge, pavement, geotechnical, pedestrian, bicycle, and transit asset categoriesdeleted text end new text begin asset planning as provided under subdivision 1fnew text end ; (2) establishment of statewide performance measures andnew text begin annualnew text end targets, reporting of performance measure results, and where possible, performance forecasts that are: (i) statewide and, where data allow, district-specific; (ii) for assets in each asset category specified innew text begin subdivision 1f, paragraph (b),new text end clause deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end ; and (iii) identified in collaboration with the public;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (3) gap identification and an explanation of the difference between performance targets and current status; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3) new text end life cycle assessment and corridor risk assessment as part of asset management programs in each district of the department. deleted text begin (c) At a minimum, the ten-year capital highway investment plan in each district of the department must: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) be based on expected funding during the plan period and, to the extent feasible, maximize long-term benefits; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) estimate the funding necessary to make optimal life cycle investments; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) identify investments within each of the asset categories specified in paragraph (b), clause (1), that are funded through the trunk highway capital program; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) identify specific trunk highway segments programmed to be removed from the trunk highway system; and deleted text end deleted text begin (5) deliver annual progress toward achieving the state transportation goals established in section 174.01. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Annually by December 15, the commissioner must report trunk highway performance measures and targets and identify gaps, including information detailing the department's progress on achieving the state transportation goalsnew text begin established in section 174.01new text end , to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance.new text begin To be finalized,new text end the report must benew text begin certified andnew text end signed by the deleted text begin commissionerdeleted text end new text begin relevant licensed professional engineersnew text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Fiscal transparency dashboard. new text end new text begin By January 1, 2027, the commissioner must provide a fiscal transparency dashboard on the department's website that summarizes fiscal information for the current fiscal year and each year in the state transportation improvement program. At a minimum, the dashboard must include: new text end new text begin (1) a summary of total expenditure amounts (i) by funding source, (ii) for projects, and (iii) for pavement and bridge asset management; new text end new text begin (2) identification of total expenditures associated with each objective in the statewide multimodal transportation plan under subdivision 1a and resulting impacts on associated performance targets; new text end new text begin (3) an overview of expenditures by investment priority area established in the Minnesota state highway investment plan under subdivision 1c; and new text end new text begin (4) identification of any performance gaps between targets and projected performance status. new text end